Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 1. Arrests.

Sec. 12.25.010.
Persons authorized to arrest.

An arrest may be made by a peace officer or by a private person.

History.

(§ 2.02 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.25.020.
Judge or magistrate may order arrest.

When a crime is committed in the presence of a judge or magistrate, the judge or magistrate may, by an oral or written order, command any person to arrest the offender, and may immediately proceed as though the offender had been brought before the court on a warrant of arrest.

History.

(§ 2.03 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 7 ch 8 SLA 1971)

Sec. 12.25.030.
Grounds for arrest by private person or peace officer without warrant.

A private person or a peace officer without a warrant may arrest a person

for a crime committed or attempted in the presence of the person making the arrest;

when the person has committed a felony, although not in the presence of the person making the arrest;

when a felony has in fact been committed, and the person making the arrest has reasonable cause for believing the person to have committed it.

In addition to the authority granted by (a) of this section, a peace officer

shall make an arrest under the circumstances described in AS

18.65.530

;

without a warrant may arrest a person if the officer has probable cause to believe the person has, either in or outside the presence of the officer,

committed a crime involving domestic violence, whether the crime is a felony or a misdemeanor; in this subparagraph, “crime involving domestic violence” has the meaning given in AS

18.66.990

;

committed the crime of violating a protective order in violation of AS

11.56.740

; or

violated a condition of release imposed under AS

12.30.016(e)

or

12.30.027

;

without a warrant may arrest a person when the peace officer has probable cause for believing that the person has

committed a crime under or violated conditions imposed as part of the person’s release before trial on misdemeanor charges brought under AS

11.41.270

;

violated AS

04.16.050

or an ordinance with similar elements; however, unless there is a lawful reason for further detention, a person who is under 18 years of age and who has been arrested for violating AS

04.16.050

or an ordinance with similar elements shall be cited for the offense and released to the person’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian;

violated conditions imposed as part of the person’s release under the provisions of AS 12.30; or

violated AS

11.41.230

at a health care facility, and the person

was not seeking medical treatment at the facility; or

was stable for discharge.

[Repealed, § 16 ch 61 SLA 1982.]

[Repealed, § 72 ch 64 SLA 1996.]

In this section, “health care facility” has the meaning given in AS

18.07.111

.

History.

(§ 2.04 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 11 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 33 ch 102 SLA 1980; am §§ 11, 16 ch 61 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 43 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 27 SLA 1986; am § 9 ch 30 SLA 1992; am § 5 ch 40 SLA 1993; am §§ 2, 3 ch 115 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 80 SLA 1995; am § 3 ch 81 SLA 1995; am § 7 ch 30 SLA 1996; am §§ 8, 72 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 11 ch 81 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 19 SLA 2010; am §§ 8, 9 ch 22 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1995, (b)(1) of this section was reorganized to harmonize amendments made by § 1, ch. 80 SLA 1995 and § 3, ch. 81, SLA 1995.

In 1996, reference to “AS

04.16.050

or an ordinance with similar elements” was deleted from (b)(3)(A) and a reference to “an ordinance with similar elements” was added in two places in (b)(3)(B) to reconcile § 7, ch. 30, SLA 1996 and § 8, ch. 64, SLA 1996.

Cross references. —

For temporary detention of persons, AS

12.50.201

.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2018 amendments to subsection (b), see sec. 30(a), ch. 22, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (b)(2)(C), substituted “AS

12.30.016(c)

” for “AS 12.30.025”, in (b)(3) substituted “probable” for “reasonable” following “when the peace officer has”, in (3)(C), substituted “under the provisions of AS 12.30” for “before trial on felony charges brought under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.458

”, and made a stylistic change.

The 2018 amendment, effective September 12, 2018, added (b)(3)(D); added (e); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

Section 13, ch. 80, SLA 1995 provides that the amendment made to subsection (b) by § 1, ch. 80, SLA 1995 applies “to offenses that are committed on or after September 13, 1995, except that references to previous conviction include convictions occurring before, on, or after September 13, 1995.”

Section 31(b), ch. 19, SLA 2010, provides that the 2010 amendment of (b) of this section applies “to arrests for violation of conditions of release occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for offenses occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2010.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 19, SLA 2010 (House Bill 324), relating to the amendment of (b) of this section, see 2010 House Journal 1401 — 1404.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Violence Against Women Act, 18 U.S.C. § 2265 (VAWA) requires the State of Alaska to enforce tribal protection orders and foreign protection orders, even where those orders are not registered as required by Alaska law. The unregistered protective order must meet due process requirements, including notice and the opportunity to be heard. If the order would qualify for arrest of the violator under an equivalent Alaska law, the violator may be arrested. The legislature is encouraged to revise Alaska's statutes to comply with VAWA. July 30, 2015 Op. Atty Gen.

Sec. 12.25.031.
Alternative to arrest.

As an alternative to arrest, a peace officer may, at the officer’s discretion, deliver a person to a crisis stabilization center or an evaluation facility or decline to arrest the person if

the arresting officer believes in good faith that the person is suffering from an acute behavioral health crisis; and

the person voluntarily agrees to be taken to a crisis stabilization center or an evaluation facility or to promptly seek outpatient mental health treatment.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a peace officer may, as an alternative to arrest, take a person into emergency custody under AS

47.30.705

and deliver the person to a crisis stabilization center or an evaluation facility.

Delivery of a person to a crisis stabilization center or an evaluation facility for examination under (a) of this section does not constitute an involuntary commitment under AS 47.30 or an arrest.

Before a person delivered to a crisis stabilization center or an evaluation facility under (a) or (b) of this section is released to the community, a mental health professional shall make reasonable efforts to inform the arresting officer of the planned release if the officer has specifically requested notification and provided the officer’s contact information to the crisis stabilization center or evaluation facility.

A peace officer is not liable for civil damages arising from an act or omission done with reasonable care and in good faith under this section.

An agreement to participate in outpatient treatment or to be delivered to a crisis stabilization center or an evaluation facility under (a) of this section

may not require a person to stipulate to any facts regarding the alleged criminal activity as a prerequisite to participation in a mental health treatment alternative;

is inadmissible in any criminal or civil proceeding; and

does not create immunity from prosecution for the alleged criminal activity.

If a person violates an agreement to be delivered to a crisis stabilization center or an evaluation facility or to seek outpatient treatment under (a) of this section,

a mental health professional shall make reasonable efforts to inform the arresting officer of the person’s decision to leave the crisis stabilization center or evaluation facility; and

the original charges may be filed or referred to the prosecutor, as appropriate, and the matter may proceed as provided by law.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, charges may be filed or referred to the prosecutor, as appropriate, at any time in accordance with law.

In this section,

“crisis stabilization center” means a facility licensed under AS 47.32 that meets the definition of “crisis stabilization center” in AS

47.32.900

;

“evaluation facility” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.915

;

“mental health professional” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.915

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 2020)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 28, SLA 2020, which enacted this section, took effect on July 28, 2020.

Sec. 12.25.033.
Arrest without warrant for operating vehicle while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance.

A peace officer may arrest a person without a warrant, whether or not the offense is committed in the presence of the officer, when the officer has probable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has committed the crime of operating a motor vehicle, an aircraft, or a watercraft in violation of AS

28.35.030

or a similar city or borough ordinance, if the violation is alleged to have occurred less than eight hours before the time of arrest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 196 SLA 1975; am § 6 ch 117 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 60 SLA 2002)

Sec. 12.25.035.
Arrest without warrant by state trooper when judicial officer is unavailable.

A state trooper may arrest a person without a warrant for a misdemeanor or for the violation of an ordinance when

the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person to be arrested has committed a misdemeanor or has violated an ordinance;

personal or property damage is likely to be done unless the person is immediately arrested; and

there is no known judicial officer empowered to issue a warrant within a radius of 25 miles of the person to be apprehended.

History.

(§ 1 ch 92 SLA 1968)

Sec. 12.25.040.
Taking before judge or magistrate person arrested by bystander.

A peace officer may, without warrant, take before a judge or magistrate a person who, being engaged in a breach of the peace, is arrested by a bystander and delivered to the peace officer.

History.

(§ 2.05 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 8 ch 8 SLA 1971)

Sec. 12.25.050.
Method of making arrest.

An arrest is made by the actual restraint of a person or by a person’s submission to the custody of the person making the arrest.

History.

(§ 2.06 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.25.060.
Method of arrest by officer without warrant.

When making an arrest without a warrant, the peace officer shall inform the person to be arrested of the officer’s authority and the cause of the arrest, unless the person to be arrested is then engaged in the commission of a crime, or is pursued immediately after its commission or after an escape.

History.

(§ 2.07 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.25.070.
Limitation on restraint in arrest.

A peace officer or private person may not subject a person arrested to greater restraint than is necessary and proper for the arrest and detention of the person.

History.

(§ 2.08 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.25.080.
Means to effect resisted arrest. [Repealed, § 21 ch 59 SLA 1982. For present provisions, see AS 11.81.370 — 11.81.390.]

Sec. 12.25.090.
Peace officer’s authority to summon aid to make arrest.

A peace officer making an arrest may orally summon as many persons as the officer considers necessary to aid in making the arrest. A person when required by an officer shall aid in making the arrest.

History.

(§ 2.10 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.25.100.
Breaking into building or vessel to effect arrest.

A peace officer may break into a building or vessel in which the person to be arrested is or is believed to be, if the officer is refused admittance after the officer has announced the authority and purpose of the entry.

History.

(§ 2.11 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.25.110.
Breaking open building or vessel to liberate.

A peace officer may break open a building or vessel to liberate a person who entered to make an arrest and is detained, or to liberate oneself when necessary.

History.

(§ 2.12 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.25.120.
Retaking escaped prisoner.

If a person arrested escapes or is rescued, the person from whose custody that person escaped or was rescued may immediately pursue and retake that person at any time and in any place in the state.

History.

(§ 2.13 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.25.130.
Means usable to retake prisoner. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978. For present provisions, see AS 11.81.370 — 11.81.390.]

Sec. 12.25.140.
Property taken from defendant on arrest.

When money or other property is taken from a person arrested upon a charge of a crime, the officer taking it shall immediately make duplicate receipts for the property, specifying particularly the amount of money or kind of property taken.
The officer shall deliver one receipt to the person arrested and the other to the judge or magistrate who examines the charge or, if the arrest is after the information or indictment, to the clerk of the court where the action is pending.

History.

(§ 2.15 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 9 ch 8 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For admission to adult correctional facilities, see 22 AAC 5, art. 1.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 8, SLA 1971 (HB 15), see 1971 House Journal, p. 52.

Collateral references. —

Right to compensation for real property damaged by law enforcement personnel in course of apprehending suspect. 23 ALR5th 834.

Sec. 12.25.150.
Rights of prisoner after arrest.

A person arrested shall be taken before a judge or magistrate without unnecessary delay and in any event within 24 hours after arrest, absent compelling circumstances, including Sundays and holidays. The unavailability of a report prepared by the pretrial services officer under AS 33.07 or a delay in the transmittal of that report to the parties or to the court may not be considered a sufficient compelling circumstance to justify delaying a hearing beyond 24 hours. The hearing before the judge or magistrate may not take place more than 48 hours after arrest. This requirement applies to municipal police officers to the same extent as it does to state troopers.

Immediately after an arrest, a prisoner shall have the right to telephone or otherwise communicate with the prisoner’s attorney and any relative or friend, and any attorney at law entitled to practice in the courts of Alaska shall, at the request of the prisoner or any relative or friend of the prisoner, have the right to immediately visit the person arrested. This subsection does not provide a prisoner with the right to initiate communication or attempt to initiate communication under circumstances proscribed under AS

11.56.755

.

It shall be unlawful for an officer having custody of a person so arrested to wilfully refuse or neglect to grant the prisoner the rights provided by this section. A violation of this section is a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, the offender is punishable by a fine of not more than $100, or by imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or by both.

In addition to the criminal liability in (c) of this section, an officer having a prisoner in custody who refuses to allow an attorney to visit the prisoner when proper application is made therefor shall forfeit and pay to the party aggrieved the sum of $500, recoverable in a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 2.16 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 10 ch 8 SLA 1971; am § 2 ch 31 SLA 1973; am § 18 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 5 ch 86 SLA 1998; am § 16 ch 20 SLA 2011; am § 50 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For procedures, see Alaska Rule of Criminal Procedure 5.

Administrative Code. —

For admission to adult correctional facilities, see 22 AAC 5, art. 1.

For operations, see 22 AAC 5, art. 3.

For communications, see 22 AAC 5, art. 8.

For discharge, see 22 AAC 5, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “within 48 hours after arrest” for “within 24 hours after arrest”.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, rewrote (a), which read, “A person arrested shall be taken before a judge or magistrate without unnecessary delay, and in any event within 48 hours after arrest, including Sundays and holidays. This requirement applies to municipal police officers to the same extent as it does to state troopers.”

Editor’s notes. —

Section 28(a), ch. 20, SLA 2011, provides that the 2011 amendment to this section applies “to arrests for offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2011.”

Sec. 12.25.160.
Definition of “arrest.”

Arrest is the taking of a person into custody in order that the person may be held to answer for the commission of a crime.

History.

(§ 2.01 ch 34 SLA 1962)